Florida, session 2026, SB1384.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âPresent subsection (7) of section 316.2085, 19 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (8), and a new 20 subsection (7) is added to that section, to read: 21 316.2085âRiding on motorcycles or mopeds.â 22 (7)âA person operating a motorcycle or moped may not carry 23 a child under 8 years of age, or allow a child under 8 years of 24 age to ride on the motorcycle or moped, unless the child is 25 properly seated in a sidecar attached to the motorcycle or moped 26 and restrained in accordance with applicable passenger safety 27 laws and regulations. This subsection does not apply to a person 28 operating a motorcycle while participating in a parade. 29 Section 2.âSubsection (1) of section 316.613, Florida 30 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (5) of that section is 31 reenacted, to read: 32 316.613âChild restraint requirements.â 33 (1)(a)âEvery operator of a motor vehicle as defined in this 34 section, while transporting a child in a motor vehicle operated 35 on the roadways, streets, or highways of this state, shall, if 36 the child is 8 5 years of age or younger, provide for protection 37 of the child by properly using a crash-tested, federally 38 approved child restraint device. 39 1.âFor children aged through 2 3 years, such restraint 40 device must be rear-facing and use a 5-point harness a separate 41 carrier or a vehicle manufacturerâs integrated child seat. 42 2.âFor children aged 3 4 through 4 5 years, such restraint 43 device may be rear-facing or forward-facing and must use a 5 44 point harness a separate carrier, an integrated child seat, or a 45 child booster seat may be used. 46 3.âFor children aged 5 through 8 years, such restraint 47 device must be a child booster seat that incorporates the use of 48 the motor vehicleâs safety belt as defined in s. 316.614(3)(b) 49 or must be forward-facing and use a 5-point harness. This 50 subparagraph does not apply to a child over 4 feet 9 inches in 51 height. 52 (b)âHowever, The requirement to use a child restraint 53 device under subparagraph (a)2. or subparagraph (a)3. this 54 subparagraph does not apply when a safety belt is used as 55 required in s. 316.614(4)(a) and the child: 56 1.a.âIs being transported gratuitously by an operator who 57 is not a member of the childâs immediate family; 58 2.b.âIs being transported in a medical emergency situation 59 involving the child; or 60 3.c.âHas a medical condition that necessitates an exception 61 as evidenced by appropriate documentation from a health care 62 professional. 63 (c)(b)âThe department shall provide notice of the 64 requirement for child restraint devices, which notice shall 65 accompany the delivery of each motor vehicle license tag. 66 (5)âAny person who violates this section commits a moving 67 violation, punishable as provided in chapter 318 and shall have 68 3 points assessed against his or her driver license as set forth 69 in s. 322.27. In lieu of the penalty specified in s. 318.18 and 70 the assessment of points, a person who violates this section may 71 elect, with the courtâs approval, to participate in a child 72 restraint safety program approved by the chief judge of the 73 circuit in which the violation occurs, and, upon completing such 74 program, the penalty specified in chapter 318 and associated 75 costs may be waived at the courtâs discretion and the assessment 76 of points shall be waived. The child restraint safety program 77 must use a course approved by the Department of Highway Safety 78 and Motor Vehicles, and the fee for the course must bear a 79 reasonable relationship to the cost of providing the course. 80 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.